Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2342.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 15, 1982 (P.L.1291, No.292), known as the Medicare Supplement Insurance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Applications for medicare supplement policies.(a) An insurer of a medicare supplement policy for an applicant may not deny, condition the issuance or effectiveness of or discriminate in the pricing of the medicare supplement 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 policy because of the status, claims experience, receipt of health care or medical condition of the applicant.(b) This section applies to an applicant who:(1) Submits an application for a medicare supplement policy before or during the six-month period beginning on the first day of the first month during which the applicant is:(i) at least 65 years of age; and(ii) timely enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B without penalty under Federal law.(2) Meets all of the following conditions:(i) Is at least 65 years of age.(ii) Is insured under a medicare supplement policy.(iii) Submits an application for a medicare supplement policy:(A) to an insurer of a medicare supplement policy that is different from the insurer of the applicant's current medicare supplement policy; and(B) within 60 days of the applicant's birthday.(iv) Seeks to maintain the same type of lettered medicare supplement plan, including any variation of the lettered medicare supplement plan.(c) A new medicare supplement policy issued to an applicant described under subsection (b)(2) must go into effect on the first day of the month that is at least 30 days after the signature date on the application for the medicare supplement policy.Section 2. The addition of section 4.1 of the act shall apply to a medicare supplement policy that is delivered, issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20260HB2342PN3115 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930